New Jersey, session 221, S2382.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A public school employee shall notify the principal or the principals designee when a student allegedly commits an assault upon another student on school property, on a school bus, or at a school-sponsored function.  After being notified by the school employee, the principal or the principals designee shall immediately report the incident to the appropriate law enforcement agency. b.  As used in this section: Assault means the same as that term is defined pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:12-1. Law enforcement agency means a department, division, bureau, commission, board or other authority of the State or of any political subdivision thereof which employs law enforcement officers. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.